Nevada, session 83, AB5.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 624.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.270 1. Before issuing a contractor’s license to any
applicant, the Board shall require that the applicant:
(a) File with the Board a surety bond in a form acceptable to the
Board executed by the contractor as principal with a corporation
authorized to transact surety business in the State of Nevada as
surety; or
(b) In lieu of such a bond, establish with the Board a cash
deposit as provided in this section.
2. Before granting renewal of a contractor’s license to any
applicant, the Board shall require that the applicant file with the
Board satisfactory evidence that the applicant’s surety bond or cash
deposit is in full force, unless the applicant has been relieved of the
requirement as provided in this section.
3. Failure of an applicant or licensee to file or maintain in full
force the required bond or to establish the required cash deposit
constitutes cause for the Board to deny, revoke, suspend or refuse to
renew a license.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, the amount of
each bond or cash deposit required by this section must be fixed by
the Board with reference to the contractor’s financial and
professional responsibility and the magnitude of the contractor’s
operations, but must be not less than $1,000 or more than $500,000.
The bond must be continuous in form and must be conditioned that
the total aggregate liability of the surety for all claims is limited to
the face amount of the bond irrespective of the number of years the
bond is in force. A bond required by this section must be provided
by a person whose long-term debt obligations are rated “A” or better
by a nationally recognized rating agency. The Board may increase
or reduce the amount of any bond or cash deposit if evidence
supporting such a change in the amount is presented to the Board at
-
*AB5*

– 3 –
the time application is made for renewal of a license or at any
hearing conducted pursuant to NRS 624.2545 or 624.291. Unless
released earlier pursuant to subsection 5, any cash deposit may be
withdrawn 2 years after termination of the license in connection
with which it was established, or 2 years after completion of all
work authorized by the Board after termination of the license,
whichever occurs later, if there is no outstanding claim against it.
5. After a licensee has acted in the capacity of a licensed
contractor in the State of Nevada for not less than 5 consecutive
years, the Board may relieve the licensee of the requirement of
filing a bond or establishing a cash deposit if evidence supporting
such relief is presented to the Board. The Board may at any time
thereafter require the licensee to file a new bond or establish a new
cash deposit as provided in subsection 4:
(a) If evidence is presented to the Board supporting this
requirement;
(b) Pursuant to subsection 6, after notification of a final written
decision by the Labor Commissioner; or
(c) Pursuant to subsection 7.
 If a licensee is relieved of the requirement of establishing a cash
deposit, the deposit may be withdrawn 2 years after such relief is
granted, if there is no outstanding claim against it.
6. If the Board is notified by the Labor Commissioner pursuant
to NRS 607.165 or otherwise receives notification that three
substantiated claims for wages have been filed against a contractor
within a 2-year period, the Board shall require the contractor to file
a bond or establish a cash deposit in an amount fixed by the Board.
The contractor shall maintain the bond or cash deposit for the period
required by the Board.
7. If a contractor who performs work concerning a residential
pool or spa : [or work concerning a residential photovoltaic system
used to produce electricity:]
(a) Is determined by the Board to have violated one or more of
the provisions of NRS 624.301 to 624.305, inclusive;
(b) Enters into a contract that is later found to be void and
unenforceable against the owner pursuant to subsection 5 of NRS
624.940 or pursuant to any regulation adopted by the Board with
respect to contracts for work concerning a residential pool or spa; or
(c) [Enters into a contract on or after October 1, 2021, that is
later voided by the owner of the single-family residence pursuant to
subsection 6 of NRS 624.875 or pursuant to any regulation adopted
by the Board with respect to contracts for work concerning a
residential photovoltaic system used to produce electricity; or
(d)] Has five valid complaints filed against him or her with the
Board within any 15-day period,
-
*AB5*

– 4 –
 the Board may require the contractor to comply with the
provisions of subsection 8.
8. If the Board requires a contractor described in subsection 7
to comply with the provisions of this subsection, the contractor
shall, before commencing work concerning a residential pool or spa
, [or work concerning a residential photovoltaic system used to
produce electricity,] obtain:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a
performance bond in an amount equal to not less than 50 percent of
the amount of the contract, conditioned upon the faithful
performance of the contract in accordance with the plans,
specifications and conditions set forth in the contract. The
performance bond must be solely for the protection of the owner of
the property to be improved.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a payment
bond in an amount equal to not less than 50 percent of the amount of
the contract. The payment bond must be solely for the protection
of persons supplying labor or materials to the contractor, or to any
of his or her subcontractors, in carrying out the provisions of the
contract.
 A bond required pursuant to this subsection must be provided by
a person whose long-term debt obligations are rated “A” or better by
a nationally recognized rating agency. The contractor shall maintain
the bond for the period required by the Board. The contractor shall
furnish to the building department of the city or county, as
applicable, in which the work will be carried out, a copy of any
bond. In lieu of a performance or payment bond, the contractor may
obtain an equivalent form of security approved by the Board.
9. A contractor who performs work concerning a residential
photovoltaic system used to produce electricity shall, before
commencing the work, obtain:
(a) A performance bond in an amount equal to not less than
100 percent of the amount of the contract, conditioned upon the
faithful performance of the contract in accordance with the plans,
specifications and conditions set forth in the contract. The
performance bond must be solely for the protection of the owner
of the property to be improved.
(b) A payment bond in an amount equal to not less than 100
percent of the amount of the contract. The payment bond must be
solely for the protection of persons supplying labor or materials to
the contractor, or to any of his or her subcontractors, in carrying
out the provisions of the contract.
 The bond required pursuant to this subsection must be provided
by a surety who is authorized to transact surety business in this
State pursuant to NRS 679A.030, who is included in the United
-
*AB5*

– 5 –
States Department of the Treasury’s Listing of Approved Sureties
and whose long-term debt obligations are rated “A” or better by a
nationally recognized rating agency. The contractor shall
maintain the bond for the period required by the Board. The
contractor shall furnish to the building department of the city or
county, as applicable, in which the work will be carried out, a copy
of any bond.
10. As used in this section, [“substantiated] :
(a) “Substantiated claim for wages” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 607.165.
(b) “Work concerning a residential photovoltaic system used to
produce electricity” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 624.855.
(c) “Work concerning a residential pool or spa” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 624.915.
Sec. 2. 1. The amendatory provisions of section 1 of this act
do not apply to a contractor whose license authorizes the contractor
to perform work concerning a residential photovoltaic system used
to produce electricity was issued before July 1, 2025, until the date
on which the license is renewed, unless the contractor:
(a) Is determined by the Board to have violated one or more of
the provisions of NRS 624.301 to 624.305, inclusive;
(b) Enters into a contract on or after July 1, 2025, that is later
voided by the owner of the single-family residence pursuant to
subsection 6 of NRS 624.875 or pursuant to any regulation adopted
by the Board with respect to contracts for work concerning a
residential photovoltaic system used to produce electricity; or
(c) Has five valid complaints filed against him or her with the
Board within any 15-day period.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Board” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 624.010.
(b) “Contractor” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 624.020.
(c) “Work concerning a residential photovoltaic system used to
produce electricity” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 624.855.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB5*